Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 106, O.S.L.
2022 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 11-201), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 11-201. As school library media center resources are
finite, the library media program shall be reflective of the
community standards for the population the library media center
serves when acquiring an age-appropriate collection of print
materials, nonprint materials, multimedia resources, equipment, and
supplies adequate in quality and quantity to meet the needs of
students in all areas of the school library media program. For
purposes of this section, "community standards" shall not include
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2978 Page 1

depi ctions nor descriptions of sexually explicit conduct as defined
in Section 1024.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 9th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of ______, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. B. NO. 2978 Page 2